North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55. North Carolina Business Corporation Act.
Part 1. Short Title and Reservation of Power.

§ 55-1-01.
Short title.

This Chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “North Carolina Business Corporation Act.”

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1989, c. 265, s. 1.

§ 55-1-02.
Reservation of power to amend or repeal.

The General Assembly has power to amend or repeal all or part of this Chapter at any time and all domestic and foreign corporations subject to this Chapter are governed by the amendment or repeal.

History.

1901, c. 2, s. 7; Rev., s. 1136; C.S., s. 1135; G.S., s. 55-36; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1989, c. 265, s. 1.

§§ 55-1-03 through 55-1-19.

Reserved for future codification purposes.